Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7967A. FORT BEND COUNTY MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 147

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7967A.0101. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality.

(3) "District" means the Fort Bend County Municipal Utility District No. 147.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 782 (H.B. 5312), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 7967A.0102. NATURE AND PURPOSES OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal utility district in Fort Bend County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 52, Article III, and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 782 (H.B. 5312), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 7967A.0201. DEFINED AREAS. (a) Notwithstanding the limitation on authorization based on acreage under Section 54.801(a), Water Code, the district may establish and administer defined areas as provided by Subchapter J, Chapter 54, Water Code.

(b) Under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may construct, acquire, improve, maintain, or operate in a defined area established under this section:

(1) macadamized, graveled, or paved roads; or

(2) improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

(c) The district may issue bonds or other obligations as provided by Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, to finance the construction, acquisition, improvement, maintenance, or operation of projects under Subsection (b).

(d) The district may impose an ad valorem tax on real property in a defined area to pay the principal of or interest on bonds issued under Subsection (c) to finance projects benefiting the defined area.

(e) The district may not issue bonds or other obligations secured wholly or partly by ad valorem taxes to finance a project authorized by Subsection (b) unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the voters of the defined area to be benefited by the project as provided by Subchapter J, Chapter 54, Water Code, voting at an election called for that purpose.

(f) At the time of issuance, the total principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance projects authorized by Subsection (b) benefiting a defined area may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the defined area.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 782 (H.B. 5312), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 7967A.0202. AUTHORITY FOR ROAD PROJECTS. (a) Under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may design, acquire, construct, finance, issue bonds for, improve, and convey to this state, a county, or a municipality for operation and maintenance macadamized, graveled, or paved roads described by Section 54.234, Water Code, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

(b) The district may exercise the powers provided by this section without submitting a petition to or obtaining approval from the commission as required by Section 54.234, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 782 (H.B. 5312), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 7967A.0203. APPROVAL OF ROAD PROJECT. (a) The district may not undertake a road project authorized by Section 7967A.0202 unless:

(1) each municipality or county that will operate and maintain the road has approved the plans and specifications of the road project, if a municipality or county will operate and maintain the road; or

(2) the Texas Transportation Commission has approved the plans and specifications of the road project, if the state will operate and maintain the road.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (a), the district is not required to obtain approval from the Texas Transportation Commission to design, acquire, construct, finance, issue bonds for, improve, or convey a road project.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 782 (H.B. 5312), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 7967A.0204. COMPLIANCE WITH MUNICIPAL CONSENT ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION. The district shall comply with all applicable requirements of any ordinance or resolution that is adopted under Section 54.016 or 54.0165, Water Code, and that consents to the creation of the district or to the inclusion of land in the district.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 782 (H.B. 5312), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 7967A.0205. LIMITATION ON USE OF EMINENT DOMAIN. The district may not exercise the power of eminent domain outside the district boundaries to acquire a site or easement for a road project authorized by Section 7967A.0202.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 782 (H.B. 5312), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS

Sec. 7967A.0301. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. The district may issue bonds or other obligations payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, impact fees, revenue, contract payments, grants, or other district money, or any combination of those sources, to pay for any authorized district purpose.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 782 (H.B. 5312), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 7967A.0302. TAXES FOR BONDS. At the time the district issues bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, the board shall provide for the annual imposition of a continuing direct ad valorem tax, without limit as to rate or amount, while all or part of the bonds are outstanding as required and in the manner provided by Sections 54.601 and 54.602, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 782 (H.B. 5312), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 7967A.0303. BONDS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. At the time of issuance, the total principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance road projects and payable from ad valorem taxes may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 782 (H.B. 5312), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.